Massachusetts, session 194th, S425.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2B of Chapter 71 of the general Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition is hereby amended by striking out the words, in line 4, “may be taught” and
inserting in place thereof the following: “shall be taught in each of the Commonwealth’s
secondary schools”
SECTION 2. Section 2B of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “society” in line 8 the following:-
“As many children with autism have been able to learn and communicate successfully via sign
language because it is visually based, unaided, and provides a mode of quick communication.”
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 2B of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition is hereby further amended by striking out the word, in line 8, “may” and
inserting in place thereof the following: “shall”.
of 2